Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 28.11 The Rhode Island Cannabis Act
21-28.11-10.4.
Medical marijuana program parity.

No later than April 1, 2024, the commission shall, in collaboration with the department of health and the office of management and budget, conduct and deliver to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president of the senate a study relating to the impact of the implementation of adult use cannabis in Rhode Island on the existing medical marijuana program (MMP) established pursuant to chapter 28.6 of this title. This study shall examine and make recommendations relating to, without limitation, the following:

The extent to which the introduction of adult use cannabis has diminished or eliminated the availability of certain medical marijuana products or product types;

The extent to which patient cardholders in Rhode Island have experienced new or greater obstacles to obtaining medical marijuana, including on the basis of price, quantity, product type, or geographic location;

The extent to which the number of caregiver registrations and/or the number of plant tag certificates issued by the commission increases or decreases; and

The extent to which the introduction of the new adult use cannabis tax and license fee structure requires a realignment of the existing medical marijuana tax and license fee structure.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-11.
Cannabis testing laboratories — Licensure and oversight.

In consultation with the department of health, the commission shall have authority to promulgate regulations to create and implement all licenses involving cannabis reference testing requirements, including approval of laboratory proficiency programs and proficiency sample providers, quality assurance sample providers, round robin testing and regulations establishing quality control and test standardization, and create and implement additional types and classes of licensed cannabis testing facilities in accordance with regulations promulgated hereunder.

The regulations promulgated by the commission shall at a minimum provide for the licensure and oversight of cannabis testing laboratories, and shall establish testing protocols for the sampling, testing and analysis of cannabis, finished cannabis and cannabis products in consultation with the department of health. Such regulations shall be based on the most recent standards as issued by the United States Pharmacopeial Convention and shall address sampling and analysis to characterize the cannabinoid profile and biological and chemical contaminants, including, but not limited to, pesticides, herbicides, plant growth regulators, metals, microbiological contaminants, and residual solvents introduced through cultivation of cannabis plants and post-harvest processing and handling of cannabis, cannabis products and ingredients.

No cannabis or cannabis product shall be sold or otherwise marketed pursuant to this chapter that has not first been tested by a cannabis testing laboratory and determined to meet the commission’s testing protocols issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

A licensed cannabis testing laboratory shall transport, store, possess, and test cannabis in compliance with regulations promulgated by the commission. Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing a cannabis testing laboratory to transfer or sell cannabis to a consumer. A direct sale or transfer from a cannabis testing laboratory licensee to a consumer is prohibited.

A cannabis testing laboratory shall report any results indicating contamination to the commission, the department of health and the department of environmental management within forty-eight (48) hours of identification.

No laboratory agent or employee of a cannabis testing laboratory shall receive direct or indirect financial compensation, other than such reasonable contractual fees to conduct such testing, from any entity for which it is conducting testing pursuant to this chapter.

No individual who possesses an interest in or is a laboratory agent employed by a cannabis testing laboratory, and no immediate family member of that individual, shall possess an interest in or be employed by a cultivator, product manufacturer or retail cannabis establishment.

To qualify for issuance of a cannabis testing laboratory license under this section, an applicant shall satisfy all qualifications established by the commission to include, but not be limited to, the following:

Apply for a license in a manner prescribed by the commission;

Provide proof that the applicant is twenty-one (21) years of age or older and is a resident of the state;

Undergo a criminal record background check pursuant to §

21-28.11-12.1

and on any terms established by the commission;

Provide proof that the applicant is current and in compliance with all obligations for filings and payments for taxes with the division of taxation;

Provide a nonrefundable application fee as determined by the commission and promulgated by rules and regulations and apply for a testing license from the commission prior to testing, processing or transporting cannabis; and

Prior to the issuance of any license and for any period of renewal, the applicant shall submit an annual license fee as determined by the commission and promulgated by rules and regulations.

Cannabis testing laboratories shall be responsible for ensuring the following, as related to laboratory agents:

A laboratory agent shall be registered with the commission prior to volunteering or working at a cannabis testing laboratory;

A cannabis testing laboratory shall apply to the commission for a registration document for each affiliated laboratory agent by submitting, at a minimum, the name, address, and date of birth of the laboratory agent;

A laboratory agent shall undergo a criminal background check pursuant to §

21-28.11-12.1

and on terms established by the commission, prior to volunteering or working at a cannabis testing laboratory. Laboratory agents shall also have a continuing duty to notify the commission of any criminal conviction(s) that occur after the issuance of a registration document. A criminal conviction shall not automatically result in suspension or revocation of registration, but shall be subject to §

21-28.11-12.1

; and

A cannabis testing laboratory shall notify the commission within one business day if a laboratory agent ceases to be associated with the laboratory, and the laboratory agent’s registration document shall be immediately revoked.

A cannabis testing laboratory and all agents and employees shall comply with all rules adopted by the commission and all applicable laws.

As a condition of licensing and pursuant to the provisions of §

21-28.11-20

, cannabis testing laboratories shall consent and be subject to inspection by the commission or personnel designated by the commission for the purposes of ensuring and enforcing compliance with this chapter and all rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, to include, but not be limited to, the provisions of chapter 5 of title 28 (the “fair employment practices act”).

Persons issued cannabis testing laboratory licenses shall be subject to the following:

A licensed cannabis testing laboratory shall notify and request approval from the commission of any change in his or her name or address within ten (10) days of the change. A licensed cannabis testing laboratory who fails to notify the commission of any of these changes shall be subject to an administrative fine of no more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) or other penalty as determined by the commission.

When a licensed cannabis testing laboratory notifies the commission of any changes listed in this subsection, the commission shall issue the licensed cannabis testing laboratory a new registry identification document after the department approves the changes and receives from the licensee payment of a fee specified in regulation.

If a licensed cannabis testing laboratory loses his or her license document, he or she shall notify the commission and submit a fee specified in regulation not to exceed the amount of one hundred dollars ($100), within ten (10) days of losing the license document. The commission shall issue a new license with a new random identification number.

A licensed cannabis testing laboratory has a continuing duty to notify the commission of any criminal conviction(s) of a laboratory licensee or agent that occurs after the issuance of a license or registration. A criminal conviction relating solely to a cannabis offense shall not automatically result in suspension or revocation of a license, but shall be subject to §

21-28.11-12.1

.

If a licensed cannabis testing laboratory violates any provision of this chapter or regulations promulgated hereunder as determined by the commission, his or her issued license may be suspended and/or revoked.

Immunity.

No licensed cannabis testing laboratory licensee or agent shall be subject to: arrest; prosecution; search or seizure, except as authorized pursuant to §§

21-28.11-20

and

21-28.11-27

and by subsection (f) of this section; or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business, occupational, or professional licensing board or entity, solely for acting in accordance with this chapter, chapter 28.6 of this title and the rules and regulations promulgated by the commission.

No principal officers, board members, agents, volunteers, or employees of a licensed cannabis testing laboratory shall be subject to arrest; prosecution; search or seizure, except as authorized pursuant to §§

21-28.11-20

and

21-28.11-27

and by subsection (f) of this section; or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business, occupational, or professional licensing board or entity, solely for working for or with a licensed cannabis cultivator to engage in acts permitted by this chapter, chapter 28.6 of this title and the rules and regulations promulgated by the commission.

No state employee or commission member shall be subject to arrest; prosecution; search or seizure, except as authorized pursuant to §§ 21-28.11-20 and 21-28.11-27 and by subsection (f) of this section; or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty, disciplinary action, termination, or loss of employee or pension benefits, for any and all conduct that occurs within the scope of his or her employment regarding the administration, execution, and/or enforcement of this chapter, chapter 28.6 of this title and the rules and regulations promulgated by the commission. The provisions of §§

9-31-8

and

9-31-9

shall be applicable to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-12.
Licenses for handlers and employees.

The commission by rule or regulation may promulgate rules and regulations to establish the registration or licensing of an individual who performs work for or on behalf of a person or entity licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter to include, but not be limited to, employees, independent contractors, transporters, security personnel, quality control or testing personnel, packagers and sales personnel. Individuals registered or licensed pursuant to this section shall be required to comply with all rules adopted by the commission and all applicable laws.

Fees for registration or licensing established by rules and regulations promulgated by the commission pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be set forth in the rules and regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-12.1.
Criminal record information — Permitted use.

The commission shall require all applicants for license and registration under this chapter to undergo a national criminal background check prior to issuing any license or registration. The applicant shall apply to the bureau of criminal identification of the department of attorney general, department of public safety division of state police, or local police department for a national background check that shall include fingerprints submitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation. Upon the discovery of any criminal record information, the bureau of criminal identification of the department of attorney general, department of public safety division of state police, or the local police department shall inform the applicant, in writing, of the nature of the criminal record information. The bureau of criminal identification of the department of attorney general, department of public safety division of state police, or the local police department shall also inform the commission, in writing, of the nature of the criminal record information. In those situations in which no criminal record information has been found, the bureau of criminal identification of the department of attorney general, department of public safety division of state police, or the local police department shall inform the applicant and the commission, in writing, of this fact. The applicant shall be responsible for any expense associated with the national background check.

All applicants for license or registration have a duty to truthfully and fully disclose prior criminal convictions to the commission and any information the commission requests related to said convictions. If issued a license or registration by the commission, licensees have a continuing duty to truthfully and fully disclose any subsequent criminal convictions to the commission, along with any information the commission requests related to said convictions. Failure to do so may result in the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license or registration, and criminal prosecution pursuant to §

21-28.11-27

and/or other applicable law.

“Conviction” as used throughout this chapter shall have the same meaning as set forth in §

21-28.6-6(g)

.

No person shall be automatically disqualified to practice, pursue, or engage in any business or activity licensed or registered by the commission pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, solely relating to a prior conviction of a cannabis or marijuana possession crime or crimes unless:

The underlying crime or crimes involved the distribution of a controlled substance, including cannabis or marijuana, to a minor; or

The underlying crime or crimes substantially relates to the occupation to which the license or registration applies. Any other state law to the contrary will be superseded by this provision.

No occupational license or registration issued by the commission shall be suspended or revoked, solely or in part, because of a prior or subsequent possession of cannabis or marijuana offense conviction of a crime or crimes unless the underlying crime or crimes substantially relate to the occupation to which the license or registration applies. Any other state law to the contrary will be superseded by this provision.

A person who has been convicted of a crime may be disqualified to practice, pursue or engage in any business activity licensed by the commission pursuant to this chapter or chapter 28.6 of this title if the commission determines that the circumstances of the conviction are substantially related to the occupation for which the license or registration is sought. In determining if a conviction substantially relates to the occupation for which the license or registration is sought, the commission shall consider:

The state’s legitimate interest in protecting the property and the safety and welfare of specific individuals or the general public;

The relationship of the crime or crimes to the ability, capacity, and fitness required to perform the duties and discharge the responsibilities of the position of employment or occupation; and

The state’s legitimate interest in equal access to employment for individuals who have had past contact with the criminal justice system.

A person who has been convicted of a crime or crimes that substantially relates to the occupation for which a license is sought may not be automatically disqualified from the occupation if the person can establish by competent evidence, satisfactory in the discretion of the commission, of sufficient rehabilitation and present fitness to perform the duties of the occupation for which the license is sought. The commission shall consider the time elapsed since the conviction when determining sufficient rehabilitation, as well as any evidence presented by the applicant regarding:

Completion of a period of at least two (2) years after release from imprisonment, or at least two (2) years after the sentencing date for a probation sentence or suspended sentence not accompanied by incarceration, without subsequent conviction or pending criminal charge;

The nature, seriousness, and relevance of the crime or crimes for which convicted;

All circumstances relative to the crime or crimes, including mitigating circumstances surrounding the commission of the crime or crimes;

The age of the person at the time the crime or crimes were committed;

Claims that the criminal record information is in error or inadmissible; and

All other competent evidence of rehabilitation and present fitness presented, including, but not limited to, letters of reference by persons who have been in contact with the applicant since the applicant’s release from any state or federal correctional institution.

The following criminal records may not be used in connection with any application for a license or registration submitted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter:

Juvenile adjudications;

Records of arrest not followed by a conviction;

Convictions that have been, pursuant to law, annulled or expunged;

Misdemeanor convictions for which no jail sentence can be imposed; or

A conviction that does not substantially relate to the occupation for which the license or registration is sought, as determined by subsection (f) of this section.

If the commission intends to deny, suspend, or revoke an occupational license, permit, or registration solely or in part because of the individual’s prior conviction of a crime that is determined to be substantially related to the occupation for which the license or registration applies, the commission shall notify the individual in writing of the following prior to the final decision:

The specific conviction(s) that forms the basis for the potential denial, suspension, or revocation and the rationale for deeming the conviction substantially related to the occupation or activity;

A copy of the conviction history report, if any, on which the commission relies;

A statement that the applicant may provide evidence of mitigation or rehabilitation, as described in subsection (g) of this section; and

Instructions on how to respond to the potential denial, suspension, or revocation.

After receiving the notice of potential denial, suspension, or revocation, the individual shall have thirty (30) business days to respond.

If the commission denies, suspends, or revokes a license or registration solely or in part because of the applicant’s substantially related conviction, the commission shall issue a final written decision that addresses the following:

The specific conviction(s) that form the basis for the denial, suspension, or revocation and the rationale for deeming the conviction(s) substantially related to the occupation or activity;

A copy of the conviction history report, if any, on which the commission relies;

The process for appealing the decision in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42; and

The earliest date the person may reapply for license or registration which shall not be longer than two (2) years from the date of the final decision.

Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any prior conviction for a crime that has been decriminalized, or is eligible for expungement pursuant to the provisions of this chapter cannot serve as grounds, either solely or in part, for denial, suspension or revocation of a license or registration pursuant to this chapter.

The commission shall adopt rules and regulations establishing standards and procedures consistent with the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-12.2.
Labor peace agreement — Requirements.

For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Bona fide labor organization” is a labor union that represents or is actively seeking to represent cannabis workers.

“Labor peace agreement” means an agreement between a licensee and a bona fide labor organization that, at a minimum, protects the state’s proprietary interests by prohibiting labor organizations and members from engaging in picketing, work stoppages, boycotts, and any other economic interference with the entity.

All retail licensees, including retail licensees pursuant to §

21-28.11-10.2

, hybrid cannabis retailers pursuant to §

21-28.11-10

, and compassion centers licensed pursuant to chapter 28.6 of this title shall enter into, maintain, and abide by the terms of a labor peace agreement, and shall submit to the commission an attestation by a bona fide labor organization stating that the applicant meets this section’s requirements.

Compassion centers authorized to purchase and deliver cannabis and cannabis products to registered qualifying patients and their registered primary caregivers or authorized purchasers, or other marijuana establishment licensees shall be required to meet the requirements established in this section before conducting retail adult sales of cannabis and cannabis products to consumers as a hybrid cannabis retailer pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

Compliance with the requirements of this section are deemed to be an ongoing material condition of the license, and any violation may result in suspension, revocation and/or non-renewal of the license by the commission.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the National Labor Relations Act, Labor Management Relations Act, the Railway Labor Act, or other conflicting federal law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-13.
Taxes.

The following taxes are imposed on the retail sale of adult use cannabis pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

Sales tax pursuant to the provisions of §

44-18-18

;

A state cannabis excise tax equal to ten percent (10%) of each retail sale as defined in §

44-18-8

; and

A local cannabis excise tax equal to three percent (3%) of each retail sale as defined in §

44-18-8

.

The assessment, collection, and enforcement of the sales tax pursuant to §

44-18-18

, the state cannabis excise tax, and the local cannabis excise tax shall be pursuant to the provisions of chapters 18 and 19 of title 44 and paid to the tax administrator by the retailer at the time and in the manner prescribed for sales tax in §

44-19-10

. The retailer shall add the taxes imposed by this chapter to the sales price or charge, and when added, the taxes constitute a part of the price or charge, is a debt from the consumer or user to the state, and is recoverable at law in the same manner as other debts.

All sums received by the division of taxation under this section as local cannabis excise tax or associated amounts as penalties, forfeitures, interest, costs of suit, and fines for failure to timely report or pay the local cannabis excise tax shall be distributed at least quarterly and credited and paid by the state treasurer to the city or town where the cannabis is delivered.

There is created within the general fund a restricted receipt account known as the “marijuana trust fund.” Revenue collected from the state cannabis excise tax or associated amounts as penalties, forfeitures, interest, costs of suit, and fines for failure to timely report or pay the state cannabis excise tax shall be deposited into this account and used to fund programs and activities related to program administration; revenue collection and enforcement; substance use disorder prevention for adults and youth; education and public awareness campaigns, including awareness campaigns relating to driving under the influence of cannabis; treatment and recovery support services; public health monitoring, research, data collection, and surveillance; law enforcement training and technology improvements, including grants to local law enforcement; and such other related uses that may be deemed necessary.

Revenue collected from the sales tax shall be deposited into the general fund.

The budget officer is hereby authorized to create restricted receipt accounts entitled “marijuana trust fund allocation” in any department or agency of state government wherein monies from the marijuana trust fund are appropriated by the general assembly for the programmatic purposes set forth in subsection (d) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 2, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

21-28.11-14.
Municipal fees.

No fee, tax, charge or expense shall be assessed or collected by or on behalf of a municipality from an individual licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, except for any fee, tax, charge or expense generally assessed or collected from residents or businesses located in the municipality or as required by applicable law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-15.
Municipal authority.

Other than a city or town that is a host community for an existing licensed medical cannabis treatment center, any city or town may, by resolution of the city or town council, cause to be printed on the ballot in an election held on or before November 8, 2022, the following question: “Shall new cannabis related licenses for businesses involved in the cultivation, manufacture, laboratory testing and for the retail sale of adult recreational use cannabis be issued in the city (or town)?”

Upon the adoption of a resolution by the city or town council pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the commission shall not issue any new cannabis related license pursuant to the provisions of this chapter unless and until the electors of the city or town vote to approve the issuance of new cannabis related licenses within the city or town. This provision shall not apply to the issuance of hybrid cannabis retailer licenses.

If a majority of ballots cast on which the electors indicated their choice is against granting the licenses, then no new license pursuant to this chapter shall be issued by the commission relating to the sale of recreational cannabis within the city or town. Provided, however, any existing marijuana cultivator or cannabis testing laboratory licensed pursuant to chapter 28.6 of this title shall be permitted to continue operating within the municipality pursuant to the conditions of licensure (including license renewals) without regard to a referendum conducted pursuant to this section.

Any city or town that by referendum declines to allow the issuance of new licenses relating to the sale of recreational marijuana will not be eligible to receive revenue pursuant to §

21-28.11-13

.

A city or town that by referendum declines to allow the issuance of new cannabis related licenses pursuant to the provisions of this chapter may subsequently resubmit the question required by this section to the electors of the city or town, but only upon the passage of a joint resolution of approval by the general assembly.

For the purpose of this section, “cannabis related licenses” includes licenses for cultivation, manufacture, laboratory testing and/or retail sale.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-16.
Local control.

A city or town may adopt ordinances and by-laws that impose reasonable safeguards on the operation of cannabis establishments, provided they are not unreasonable and impracticable and are not in conflict with this chapter or with regulations made pursuant to this chapter and that:

Govern the time, place and manner of cannabis establishment operations and of any business dealing in cannabis accessories, except that zoning ordinances or by-laws shall not operate to:

Prevent the conversion of a medical marijuana compassion center licensed or registered engaged in the manufacture or sale of cannabis or cannabis products to an adult use retail cannabis establishment engaged in the same type of activity under this chapter; or

Limit the number of cannabis establishments below the limits established pursuant to this chapter;

Restrict the licensed cultivation, processing and manufacturing of cannabis that is a public nuisance;

Establish reasonable restrictions on public signs related to cannabis establishments; provided, however, that if a city or town enacts an ordinance or by-law more restrictive than the commission’s standard, then the local ordinance or by-law shall not impose a standard for signage more restrictive than those applicable to retail establishments that sell alcoholic beverages within that city or town; and

Establish a civil penalty for violation of an ordinance or by-law enacted pursuant to this subsection, similar to a penalty imposed for violation of an ordinance or by-law relating to alcoholic beverages.

A city or town may adopt ordinances that ban or impose restrictions on the smoking or vaporizing of cannabis in public places, including outdoor common areas, parks, beaches, athletic and recreational facilities and other public spaces.

No city or town shall prohibit the transportation of cannabis or cannabis products or adopt an ordinance or by-law that makes the transportation of cannabis or cannabis products unreasonable and impracticable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-17.
No right to license.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as establishing a right in any person or entity to be issued a license or certificate pursuant to this chapter.

The commission shall exercise discretion to issue licenses and certificates to further the purposes of this chapter and may deny any application, suspend an application period, impose moratoriums on applications and/or issuance of licenses to further the purpose of public safety, the orderly administration of cannabis production, distribution and sale and to promote the purposes of this chapter.

No appeal for a denial of a license shall be sustained solely on the grounds that the person or entity satisfied the qualifications for issuance of a license.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.

21-28.11-17.1.
General conditions for licenses.

Upon receipt of a complete cannabis establishment license application and the application fee, the commission shall forward a copy of the application to the city or town in which the cannabis establishment is to be located, determine whether the applicant and the premises qualify for the license and has complied with this chapter and shall, within ninety (90) days:

Acknowledge that the application is satisfactory and complete; or

Send to the applicant a notice of rejection setting forth specific reasons why the license application is incomplete, rejected, unsatisfactory or fails to comply with the application requirements.

The commission may, subject to the rules and regulations promulgated by the commission and in the exercise of the commission’s discretion pursuant to §

21-28.11-17

, approve a cannabis establishment license application and issue a license if:

The prospective cannabis establishment has submitted an application in compliance with regulations made by the commission, the applicant satisfies the requirements established by the commission, the applicant is in compliance with this chapter and the regulations made by the commission and the applicant has paid any required fee;

No notification of non-compliance from the city or town has been received by the commission within forty-five (45) days;

The property where the proposed cannabis establishment is to be located, at the time the license application is received by the commission, is not located within five hundred feet (500´) of a pre-existing public or private school providing education in kindergarten or any of grades one through twelve (12), unless a city or town adopts an ordinance or by-law that reduces the distance requirement;

The applicant, and any agents or employees of the applicant as required by the commission pursuant to its rules and regulations, have undergone a criminal background check pursuant to §

21-28.11-12.1

and on terms established by the commission;

As a condition of licensing, cannabis establishments shall consent and be subject to inspection by the commission for the purposes of ensuring and enforcing compliance with this chapter and all rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, to include, but not be limited to, the provisions of chapter 5 of title 28 (the “fair employment practices act”), chapter 28 of this title (the “the uniform controlled substances act”) and title 44 (“taxation”); and

Every individual who will be a controlling person of the proposed cannabis establishment has not been convicted of a felony or convicted of an offense in another state that would be a felony in this state and which would substantially relate to the occupation for which the applicant has applied for licensure, or the prior conviction is solely for a marijuana possession offense subject to expungement, or the individual is determined to be not disqualified pursuant to §

21-28.11-12.1

.

In addition to requirements established in regulation, by the commission, or by ordinance of a city or town pursuant to this chapter, a cannabis establishment shall:

Secure every entrance to the establishment in order that access to areas containing cannabis is restricted to employees and others permitted by the cannabis establishment to access the area and to agents of the commission or state and local law enforcement officers and emergency personnel; and

Secure its inventory and equipment during and after operating hours to deter and prevent theft of cannabis, cannabis products and cannabis accessories.

No cannabis establishment may cultivate, process, test, store or manufacture cannabis or cannabis products at any location other than at a physical address which has been approved by the commission and within an area that is enclosed and secured in a manner that prevents access by persons not permitted by the cannabis establishment to access the area.

No cannabis establishment shall allow cultivation, processing, manufacture, sale or display of cannabis or cannabis products to be visible from a public place without the use of binoculars, aircraft or other optical aids, as determined by the commission.

No cannabis establishment shall refuse representatives of the commission the right at any time of operation to inspect the entire licensed premises or to audit the books and records of the cannabis establishment for the purposes of ensuring and enforcing compliance with this chapter and all rules and regulations promulgated by the commission pursuant to this chapter.

No cannabis establishment shall allow any person under twenty-one (21) years of age to volunteer or work for the cannabis establishment.

No cannabis establishment shall cultivate, manufacture, sell or otherwise transact business involving any products containing cannabinoids other than those that were produced, distributed and taxed in compliance with this chapter.

All cannabis establishments shall be subject to any regulations promulgated by the commission that specify the manner by which cannabis shall be tested, including but not limited to, potency, cannabinoid profile, and contaminants.

All cannabis establishments shall be subject to any product labeling requirements promulgated by the commission.

License required. No person or entity shall operate a cannabis establishment without an appropriate license(s) and/or registration(s) issued by the commission.

Each licensee shall file an emergency response plan with the fire department and police department of the host community pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the commission pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 1, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 1, effective May 25, 2022.